Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 6.
Forest Wardens and Fires.

§ 10.1-1149. Southeastern Interstate Forest Fire Protection Compact.

Chapter 63 of the 1956 Acts of Assembly authorizing the Governor to execute a compact to promote effective prevention and control of forest fires in the Southeastern region of the United States, is incorporated in this Code by this reference.

(1956, c. 63, §

27-5.2

; 1988, c. 891.)

§ 10.1-1150. Middle Atlantic Interstate Forest Fire Protection Compact.

Chapter 6 of the 1966 Acts of Assembly authorizing the Governor to execute a compact to promote effective prevention and control of forest fires in the Middle Atlantic region of the United States, is incorporated in this Code by this reference.

(1966, c. 6, §

27-5.4

; 1988, c. 891.)

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 8B M.J. Fires,

§

14.